Washington statutes.
RCW 41.72.040

Law enforcement medal of honor may be awarded posthumously.

The state law enforcement medal of honor may be awarded posthumously to be presented to the representative of the deceased as may be deemed appropriate by the governor or the designees specified in RCW 41.72.030.

[ 1994 c 89 s 4.]